Utah statutes.
48-2a-100.   Scope of chapter.

Until this chapter is repealed January 1, 2016, this chapter applies only to a limited partnership formed on or before December 31, 2013, that has not elected to be governed by Chapter 2e, Utah Uniform Limited Partnership Act, as provided in Section 48-2e-1205.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

